Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:
1. "Qualified employer" means the Oklahoma State Treasurer's
Office and the Oklahoma State Auditor and Inspector's Office; and
2. "Qualified employee" means any person, regardless of the
date of hire, employed in this state by or contracting in this state
with a qualified employer on or after January 1, 2026, and who is a
certified public accountant (CPA) who has passed the CPA examination
and met the licensing requirements in this state.
Req. No. 11072 Page 1

This definition shall also not be interpreted to exclude any
person (1) who previously qualified and established the credit
against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes and becomes employed by a different qualified
employer, or (2) who establishes the credit against the tax imposed
pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes for
the first time and becomes employed by a different qualified
employer in subsequent years, provided a person in either case has
not claimed the credit for the lifetime maximum of five (5) years.
B. 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and
ending before January 1, 2030, a qualified employee shall be allowed
a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of Title
68 of the Oklahoma Statutes of up to Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00) per tax year for a period of time not to exceed five (5)
years during the lifetime of the qualified employee. This credit
may be claimed in nonconsecutive tax years.
2. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to
reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).
3. Any credit claimed, but not used, may be carried over, in
order, to each of the five (5) subsequent taxable years.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11072 AO 01/09/25

Req. No. 11072 Page 2